Washington statutes.
RCW 18.134.070

Reimbursement—Prior patient consent for direct billing required.

(1) Nothing in chapter 212, Laws of 2024 shall be construed to require a health carrier as defined in RCW 48.43.005, a health plan offered under chapter 41.05 RCW, or medical assistance offered under chapter 74.09 RCW to reimburse for telehealth services that do not meet statutory requirements for reimbursement of telemedicine services.

(2) This chapter does not permit a health care practitioner to bill a patient directly for a telehealth service that is not a permissible telemedicine service under chapter 48.43, 41.05, or 74.09 RCW without receiving patient consent to be billed prior to providing the telehealth service.

[ 2024 c 212 s 10.]